Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Egg Marketing Law

260.540.
Definitions for KRS 260.540 to 260.650.

As used in KRS

260.540

to

260.650

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Ambient temperature” means the atmospheric temperature surrounding or encircling shell eggs;

“Board” means the Egg Marketing Board;

“Candle” means to determine the interior quality of a shell egg based on the use of a candling light as defined in the USDA Handbook 75(7 CFR Part 56);

“Candled and graded” means candled and graded under state and federal standards and regulations;

“Case” means a container of thirty (30) dozen shell eggs as used in commercial practice in the United States. The term “half-case” shall mean a container of fifteen (15) dozen eggs. Case also means any other quantity packaging which is considered a wholesale pack;

“Check” means an egg that has a broken shell or a crack in the shell, but whose membranes are intact and whose contents are not leaking;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Consumer” means all persons purchasing eggs for consumption and not resale;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Dealer” means a person, organization, or cooperative engaged in the business of buying eggs from producers or other persons, either on his own account or as an agent, and selling or transferring eggs by the case or other quantity to a wholesaler, processor, retailer, specialty egg processor, or other persons or consumers;

“Dirty egg” means an egg that has a shell that is unbroken and has adhering dirt or foreign material, or prominent stains covering more than one-fourth (1/4) of the shell surface;

“Distributor” means any person who sells, offers, or otherwise exposes shell eggs or egg products to a wholesaler, retailer, or food service facility. “Distributor” also means any person or producer who distributes shell eggs or egg products to his or her own retail outlet, store, or food service facility;

“Egg product” means processed and convenience forms of eggs for home and commercial use, including hard-cooked, or specialty egg products and pasteurized liquid, pasteurized frozen, or pasteurized dried egg products;

“FDA” means the Federal Food and Drug Administration;

“Handler” means a dealer, packer, processor, wholesaler, distributor, or retailer;

“Inedible” means an egg that is unfit for human food in whole or in part, addled or moldy, containing black rot, white rot, blood ring, adherent yolks, or bloody whites, incubated beyond the blood ring stage, or consisting to any extent of filthy decomposed substance. This also includes any eggs unfit for human consumption due to causes other than those listed in this subsection;

“Leaker” means an egg that has a crack or break in the shell and shell membranes to the extent that the egg contents are exposed or are exuding or free to exude through the shell;

“Loss” means an egg that is unfit for human food because it is smashed or broken so that its contents are leaking; or overheated, frozen, or contaminated; or an incubator reject; or contains a bloody white, large meat spots, a large quantity of blood, or other foreign material;

“Lot” means any given quantity of two (2) or more eggs of a named grade, billed on an invoice or inspected by the department;

“Lot consolidation” means the removal of damaged eggs from consumer labeled cartons and replacement of the damaged eggs with eggs of the same grade, size, sell-by date, brand, lot, and source;

“Packer” means any person who grades, sizes, candles, and packs eggs for purposes of sale;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or any other type of business entity that traffics in, handles, or sells eggs, and shall include any trustee, receiver, or similar representative;

“Producer” means any person who exercises control over the production of eggs and disposes of eggs from the output of his or her personally owned flock;

“Registered lot consolidator” means a person who has successfully completed a training course in lot consolidation approved by the department and who is registered with the department;

“Repacking” means changing the identity of a lot of shell eggs by removing them from the original container labeled by a packer and placing them into another container not labeled by the packer at the point of origin with the same grade, size, sell-by date, lot number, source, and brand;

“Retailer” means any person selling or offering eggs for sale to consumers in this state;

“Sell” means to offer for sale, expose for sale, have in possession for sale, exchange, barter, or trade;

“Shell eggs” means the product of the domesticated hen and any other egg from the avian species offered for human consumption in its shell form;

“Specialty egg processor” means a person who operates a plant for the purpose of breaking eggs for freezing or drying or commercial food manufacturing, and includes a person distributing his or her products from out-of-state. A specialty egg processor may also be known as a breaker or breaking plant;

“Specialty egg products” means egg specialties processed for the food service industry including: wet-pack and dry-pack prepeeled hard-cooked eggs, either whole, wedged, sliced, chopped, or pickled; long rolls of hard-cooked eggs; frozen omelets; egg patties; quiche; quiche mix; frozen French toast; frozen scrambled egg mix in boilable pouches; frozen fried eggs; frozen precooked scrambled eggs; freeze-dried scrambled eggs; ultra-pasteurized liquid eggs; free-flowing frozen egg pellets; and specially coated shelf-stable hard-cooked eggs.

“Specialty egg products” does not include eggs that are combined with other products in a convenience pack such as a meal, if the total package weight cannot be fairly divided between all items in the package allowing the egg product to have a separate calculated weight;

“Stop order” means an order issued by an inspector or other authorized agent of the department removing the shell egg or egg products from sale until a release or change of order has been issued by an inspector or authorized agent of the department;

“Ungraded and candled” means the general run of edible eggs as they come from the producer, not sized or graded, but candled;

“USDA” means the United States Department of Agriculture;

“Wholesaler” means a handler who is engaged in the business of buying eggs from producers or other persons on the handler’s own account and selling or transferring eggs to other dealers, wholesalers, processors, or retailers, or through other distribution channels; and

“Withdraw from sale order” means an order issued by an inspector or other authorized agent of the department, permanently removing shell eggs or egg products from sale or distribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 1957; 1998, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 40, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 4, § 1, effective March 5, 2014.

260.550.
Prohibition against buying, selling, or processing eggs without license — Exceptions — Stop orders and withdraw from sale orders imposed for certain violations.

No person shall buy, sell, trade, traffic, or process eggs in Kentucky without a license issued pursuant to the egg marketing law, with the following exceptions:

Hatcheries purchasing eggs to be used exclusively for hatching purposes;

Hotels, restaurants, and other eating places where all eggs purchased are served in the establishment;

Bakeries, confectioneries, and ice cream manufacturers who use eggs in a manufactured product;

Consumers buying eggs for their own consumption; or

Producers who sell only directly to consumers and do not exceed a sales limit of sixty (60) dozen eggs per calendar week.

Any person engaged in the act of selling shell eggs or egg products under any of the following circumstances shall have all shell eggs and egg products placed under a stop order:

Selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg products without a license;

Selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg products without first submitting an emergency recall plan to the department; or

Failing to remit or pay fines owed to the department.

Any person engaged in the act of selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs under the following conditions shall have those eggs placed under a stop order for:

Failing to have the proper labels attached, as required by KRS

260.630

; or

Failing to meet the tolerances of consumer grades and consumer grade quality standards, as required by KRS

260.620

.

Any person engaged in the act of selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg products shall have these shell eggs or egg products placed under a withdraw from sale order for the following reasons:

Ambient temperature above forty-five (45) degrees Fahrenheit for a period of four (4) hours or more; or

Contamination or any condition which may render the shell eggs or egg products unfit for human consumption.

The withdraw from sale order shall remain in effect until such time as the disposition of the shell eggs or egg products has been determined by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 1957; 1998, ch. 208, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 40, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 66, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

260.560.
Department to administer egg marketing law — Administrative regulations — Hearings — Appeals.

The department shall administer all provisions and exercise all administrative powers in the egg marketing law. The department may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the egg marketing law.

The department may conduct administrative hearings, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, to the extent necessary for proper administration of the egg marketing law.

Any final order of the department refusing, revoking, or suspending an egg license may be appealed by the aggrieved party to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 3, effective January 1, 1957; 1996, ch. 318, § 186, effective July 15, 1996.

260.570.
Egg marketing board — Functions — Membership — Appointment — Terms — Qualifications — Meetings — Compensation.

There shall be an egg marketing board in the Department of Agriculture. The board shall act in an advisory capacity to the Commissioner in all matters pertaining to the administration of the egg marketing law.

The board shall be composed of the Commissioner, chairman ex officio, and six (6) members appointed by the Governor from lists of names submitted by egg producing and marketing organizations within the Commonwealth approved by the Commissioner for the purpose of submitting such lists. Appointments shall be for three (3) years, except that in the case of the members first appointed, two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year, two (2) members for two (2) years, and two (2) members for three (3) years. All members shall be residents of the Commonwealth and not more than three (3) shall be of the same political party.

The board shall meet at least once each calendar year and at such other times as the Commissioner, acting chairman, or a quorum of the board may deem necessary. The chairman shall serve without additional compensation, but the members shall receive reimbursement for their necessary traveling expenses and the sum of fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day they attend board meetings, payable out of funds derived from administration of the egg marketing law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 4, effective January 1, 1957; 1978, ch. 154, § 31, effective June 17, 1978; 2005, ch. 40, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 66, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

260.580.
Regulations.

The department shall prescribe reasonable regulations setting up standards governing the form and schedule for processing applications for egg licenses, the determination of whether an application for license shall be granted or denied, and the procedures and grounds for the suspension and revocation of a license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 5, effective January 1, 1957.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption date and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

260.590.
Appeals from order of department. [Repealed.]

260.600.
Licensing requirement — Fees.

Any person requiring a license may obtain an application by calling the Kentucky Department of Agriculture, Division of Regulation and Inspection. A license may be renewed when accompanied by a renewal application and the required fees. A license for the current year shall not be issued if there are past due license fees and penalties pending for previous years. With regard to shell egg dealers, wholesalers, and packers, and specialty egg processors, dealers, and wholesalers, all of the previous year’s assessment fees shall be current before licenses shall be renewed. Any person selling eggs without the required license will be subject to having the eggs removed from sale until a license has been acquired.

A license is required of each handler of eggs selling in the Commonwealth subject to the exceptions specified in KRS

260.550

. The annual license fees are as follows, varying for dealers, distributors, wholesalers, producers, and packers, according to the average weekly volume of the month in which the licensee handled the most eggs during the preceding year:

Retailers . . . . . $20.00

Shell egg dealers, distributors, wholesalers, producers, and packers within Kentucky or out-of-state:

1-25 cases or 1-750 dozen . . . . .
$20.00

26-50 cases or 751-1500 dozen
. . . . . $30.00

Over 50 cases or over 1500 dozen . . . . .
$50.00

Specialty egg processors, dealers, and wholesalers within Kentucky or out-of-state . . . . . $50.00.

Any egg handler engaged in more than one (1) type of activity for which a license is provided shall pay that license fee which is the highest of the licenses prescribed for each type of activity in which he is engaged.

All eggs bought or sold within the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall bear a two cent ($0.02) assessment fee for each fifteen (15) dozen shell egg lot or portion thereof. Pasteurized liquid and pasteurized frozen egg products shall be assessed a fee of one-half (1/2) cent ($0.005) per ten (10) pound lot. Dried, dehydrated, hard-cooked, or specialty egg products shall be assessed a fee of one cent ($0.01) per ten (10) pound lot. These assessment fees shall be assessed and paid one (1) time as agreed between responsible parties as the product moves through the distribution network. All reports and fees are due monthly and shall be received by the department prior to the fifteenth of the month following the month of activity, unless there is an agreement with the department to report and pay these fees on a quarterly, semi-annual, or annual basis. In this event, the reports and fees shall be received prior to the fifteenth of the month following the period of activity.

All licenses shall expire on April 1 of each year. Handlers having more than one (1) place of business shall hold a license for each location. Licenses shall not be transferred.

Those that are exempt from licensing under KRS

260.550

are not exempt from inspection, with the exception of consumers. The shell eggs or egg products used by these persons are not exempt from the required assessment fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 7; 1960, ch. 36, § 1; 1962, ch. 195, § 2; 1980, ch. 120, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 40, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

License fees under the egg marketing act are established by this section and a delinquent fee for a license purchased after the renewal deadline cannot be imposed without statutory authorization.

OAG 68-464

.

260.610.
Grade identification — Handling — Conditions requiring removal from retail display — Retailers prohibited from repacking eggs into full cartons — Lot consolidation permitted under supervision of registered lot consolidator — Prohibition of sale or possession for sale of inedible eggs — Emergency recall plan.

All eggs bought or sold by or to retailers, consumers, and institutional users by licensees shall be identified according to grade and size, using USDA standards and weight classes for consumer grades.

Eggs to be offered for sale for human consumption shall be handled to maintain and preserve the quality and grade in which they are to be offered for sale, including but not limited to storage, transportation, temperature, and sanitation.

A carton of eggs with any of the following existing conditions shall be removed from a retail display on a daily basis:

Cracked eggs;

Leaking eggs;

Frozen eggs; or

A combination of any of the above.

A retailer shall not rework or repack eggs into full cartons. Repacking shall be done only by the original packer. A retailer may, however:

Sell an incomplete dozen size carton provided that the quantity labeling on the carton is changed to reflect the number of eggs in the carton; or

Perform lot consolidation, provided the process is performed by or under the supervision of a registered lot consolidator. The Commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations governing the requirements for lot consolidation registration and may assess a fee of no more than twenty dollars ($20) needed to defray the costs of the registration program.

No person shall sell, offer or expose for sale, or have in his possession for sale, for human consumption, eggs that are inedible, including eggs that are unfit for human food in whole or in part, addled or moldy, containing black rot, white rot, or blood ring, adherent yolks, or bloody whites, incubated beyond the blood ring stage, or consisting to any extent of filthy decomposed substance.

No later than June 30 of each year, all packing plants and distributors shall submit an emergency recall plan to the department. The plan shall address policies and procedures that will be followed in the event of a recall of eggs or egg products pursuant to an inedible product designation, as described in subsection (5) of this section. If there have been no changes in the plan from the previous year, a statement to that effect shall be submitted in lieu of a plan on an annual basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 8; 1960, ch. 36, § 2; 1962, ch. 195, § 1; 1998, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 215, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 66, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 4, § 2, effective March 5, 2014.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section permits retailers to sell not more than five cases of eggs purchased from Kentucky producers, as ungraded and unclassified eggs, and does not restrict such retailers from selling at the same time any quantity of eggs required to be graded and classified because of being purchased from dealers, wholesalers, processors or out of state producers.

OAG 68-214

.

260.620.
Graded eggs — Standards.

Eggs offered for sale as graded eggs shall conform to the standards prescribed in administrative regulations adopted by the department. These standards shall conform to the federal standards promulgated by USDA and FDA for grading eggs for sale.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 9; 1960, ch. 36, § 3; 1998, ch. 208, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

260.630.
Labeling requirements.

All wholesale egg packs consisting of cases or portions of cases shall bear a legible label designating contents; quality; quantity; date of packing and an expiration or best-by date; dealer’s name, address, and plant number; and size and grade of eggs. Expiration dating shall include qualifying prefixes such as “EXP,” “Expiration date,” “Sell by,” “Not to be sold after date on end of carton,” “Purchase by,” “Last sale date on end of carton,” or other similar language denoting stock rotation. The dates associated with these prefixes shall be calculated from the date the eggs are originally packed into the container and may not exceed thirty (30) days including the day of pack. Best-by dating shall include qualifying prefixes such as “Use before,” “Use by,” “Best before,” “Best by,” or other similar language to generally indicate the maximum time frame for expected quality. The dates associated with these prefixes shall be calculated from the date the eggs are packed into the container and may not exceed forty-five (45) days including the day of pack. The letters on the label shall not be less than one-sixteenth (1/16) inch in height.

Graded eggs shall be offered for sale in cartons or other consumer packs and shall be plainly and legibly marked as to grade; size; quantity; dealer’s name, address, and plant number; and date of packing and an expiration or best-by date. Expiration dating shall include qualifying prefixes such as “EXP,” “Expiration date,” “Sell by,” “Not to be sold after date on end of carton,” “Purchase by,” “Last sale date on end of carton,” or other similar language denoting stock rotation. The dates associated with these prefixes shall be calculated from the date the eggs are originally packed into the container and may not exceed thirty (30) days including the day of pack. Best-by dating shall include qualifying prefixes such as “Use before,” “Use by,” “Best before,” “Best by,” or other similar language to generally indicate the maximum time frame for expected quality. The dates associated with these prefixes shall be calculated from the date the eggs are packed into the container and may not exceed forty-five (45) days including the day of pack. The marking letters shall not be less than one-sixteenth (1/16) inch in height. The information on the label shall not be altered or replaced. The quantity may be changed in accordance with KRS 260.610(4).

Eggs offered for sale that are not in a carton shall be in a container that:

Contains all information required by this section; and

Displays the information in legible letters at least one-sixteenth (1/16) inch on a label attached to the container.

The required label information on wholesale egg packs, cases, or portions of cases shall match the required label information on the carton or other consumer pack contained therein, with the exception of the dealer’s name and address.

If eggs are packed in retail “breakaway” cartons that can be divided by the consumer or retailer into smaller units for the purpose of selling lesser amounts of eggs, each half or portion of the container shall contain full information as required by subsection (2) of this section.

Wholesale egg packs, cases, or portions of cases shall be used only in the following manner:

All original label information shall be redacted completely in such a manner so that it is obvious that the container is being reused;

The new label shall contain all of the information otherwise required by this section; and

The cases shall be clean, sturdy, and intact.

Egg cartons cannot be reused.

If a producer who sells directly to consumers only is using stock cartons, the cartons shall be labeled “ungraded” followed by “produced by:” (producer’s name and address) and “sold directly to the consumer.” This information may be hand printed on the carton if it is legible and appears on the top panel of the egg carton.

Plastic or wire crates, change baskets, or racks may be used as wholesale packs without bearing the required label information only if the required label information is visible on the carton or consumer egg pack.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 11; 1960, ch. 36, § 4; 1998, ch. 208, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2008, ch. 66, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

260.640.
Employment of inspectors — Authority of inspectors — Access by the department — Licensees to keep records.

The Commissioner may employ inspectors for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of the egg marketing law. These inspectors may examine any eggs offered or exposed for sale for human consumption at the times and places and in a manner as the Commissioner may direct.

The department shall have free access, at all reasonable hours when the business is open to the general public, to any establishment, premises, or building where eggs are processed, stored, or offered for sale, and to any vehicle used to transport or hold eggs, for the purpose of inspecting the establishment, premises, building, or vehicle or the eggs to determine compliance with the provisions of the Kentucky egg marketing law.

The department shall have free access at all reasonable hours when the business is open to the general public, to any restaurant kitchen, hotel kitchen, or kitchen of any other public eating place, including schools, hospitals, nursing homes, or other similar institutions, to determine compliance with the provisions of the Kentucky egg marketing law. If the inspector determines that inspected eggs fail to comply with the Kentucky egg marketing law or standards as established by USDA, the inspector shall take the necessary action and issue an advisory on proper procedures.

All licensees shall keep a record of all eggs handled during the license year, and any other records the department shall require. These records shall be available for examination by authorized agents of the department.

An inspector may, for the purpose of enforcing the Kentucky egg marketing law, break any form of sealing on any case or retail container. If a broken seal necessitates the repacking of the cases or containers, the original packer shall absorb all expenses involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 11, effective January 1, 1957; 1998, ch. 208, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 40, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 66, § 6, effective July 15, 2008.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Personnel employed by Commonwealth, KRS Ch. 18A.

260.650.
Disposition of fees.

All fees collected under the provisions of the egg marketing law shall be credited to the department for use in carrying out the provisions of the egg marketing law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 121, § 13, effective January 1, 1957.

260.660.
Legislative intent of KRS 260.660 to 260.665. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

260.661.
Definitions for KRS 260.660 to 260.665. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

260.662.
Kentucky Milk Commission established. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

260.663.
Membership of commission — Terms — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

260.664.
Duties of commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

260.665.
Dairy industry fund. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 90, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.